Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.120

Termination—Grounds—Failure to appear.

(1) Except in the case of an Indian child and his or her parent, the parent-child relationship of a parent may be terminated upon a showing by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that it is in the best interest of the child to terminate the relationship and that the parent has failed to perform parental duties under circumstances showing a substantial lack of regard for his or her parental obligations and is withholding consent to adoption contrary to the best interest of the child.

(2) Except in the case of an Indian child and his or her *alleged father, the parent-child relationship of an *alleged father who appears and claims paternity may be terminated upon a showing by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that it is in the best interest of the child to terminate the relationship and that:

(a) The *alleged father has failed to perform parental duties under circumstances showing a substantial lack of regard for his parental obligations and is withholding consent to adoption contrary to the best interest of the child; or

(b) He is not the father.

(3) The parent-child relationship of a parent or an *alleged father may be terminated if the parent or *alleged father fails to appear after being notified of the hearing in the manner prescribed by RCW 26.33.310.

(4) The parent-child relationship of an Indian child and his or her parent or *alleged father where paternity has been claimed or established, may be terminated only pursuant to the standards set forth in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1912(f).

[ 1987 c 170 s 6; 1984 c 155 s 12.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 26.33.020 was amended by 2019 c 46 s 5034, changing the definition of "alleged father" to "alleged genetic parent."

Severability—1987 c 170: See note following RCW 13.04.030.